Indiana, session 2026, HB1388.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-28-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.194-2025,
SECTION 1, AND P.L.214-2025, SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a)
Subsection (b) does not apply to an individual who:
(1) held an Indiana limited, reciprocal, or standard teaching
license on June 30, 1985; or
(2) is granted a license under section 12.5, 16.5, or 18 of this
chapter.
(b) Except as provided in sections 12.5 and 16.5 of this chapter, the
department may not grant an initial practitioner license to an individual
unless the individual has:
(1) met the requirements of section 12.3 of this chapter; and
(2) demonstrated proficiency in the following areas on a written
examination or through other procedures prescribed by the
department:
(A) Except as provided in subsection (f), pedagogy.
(B) Knowledge of the areas in which the individual is required
2026 IN 1388—LS 7119/DI 143


to have a license to teach.
(C) If the individual is seeking to be licensed as an elementary
school teacher, comprehensive scientifically based reading
instruction skills aligned to the science of reading.
(c) An individual's license examination score may not be disclosed
by the department without the individual's consent unless specifically
required by state or federal statute or court order.
(d) Subject to section 22 of this chapter, the state board shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to do the following:
(1) Adopt, validate, and implement the examination or other
procedures required by subsection (b).
(2) Establish examination scores indicating proficiency.
(3) Otherwise carry out the purposes of this section.
(e) Subject to section 18 of this chapter, the state board shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing the conditions under which the
requirements of this section may be waived for an individual holding
a valid teacher's license issued by another state.
(f) The written examination requirement described in subsection
(b)(2)(A) is waived for an individual who is a graduate of a teacher
preparation program, unless the individual fails to obtain a
teaching license within three (3) years of graduation.
2026 IN 1388—LS 7119/DI 143